Nebraska, session 109, LB814.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB814 LB814
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-201 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this
section, all real property in this state, not expressly exempt therefrom,
shall be subject to taxation and shall be valued at its actual value.
(2) Agricultural land and horticultural land as defined in section
77-1359 shall constitute a separate and distinct class of property for
purposes of property taxation, shall be subject to taxation, unless
expressly exempt from taxation, and shall be valued at:
(a) Before January 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of its actual
value, except that for school district taxes levied to pay the principal
and interest on bonds that are approved by a vote of the people on or
after January 1, 2022, such land shall be valued at fifty percent of its
actual value; and .
(b) On or after January 1, 2027, fifty percent of its actual value.
(3) Agricultural land and horticultural land actively devoted to
agricultural or horticultural purposes which has value for purposes other
than agricultural or horticultural uses and which meets the
qualifications for special valuation under section 77-1344 shall
constitute a separate and distinct class of property for purposes of
property taxation, shall be subject to taxation, and shall be valued for
taxation at:
(a) Before January 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of its special
valuation as defined in section 77-1343, except that for school district
taxes levied to pay the principal and interest on bonds that are approved
by a vote of the people on or after January 1, 2022, such land shall be
valued at fifty percent of its special valuation as defined in section
77-1343; and .
(b) On or after January 1, 2027, fifty percent of its special
valuation as defined in section 77-1343.
(4) Historically significant real property which meets the
-2-

LB814 LB814
2026 2026
qualifications for historic rehabilitation valuation under sections
77-1385 to 77-1394 shall be valued for taxation as provided in such
sections.
(5) Tangible personal property, not including motor vehicles,
trailers, and semitrailers registered for operation on the highways of
this state, shall constitute a separate and distinct class of property
for purposes of property taxation, shall be subject to taxation, unless
expressly exempt from taxation, and shall be valued at its net book
value. Tangible personal property transferred as a gift or devise or as
part of a transaction which is not a purchase shall be subject to
taxation based upon the date the property was acquired by the previous
owner and at the previous owner's Nebraska adjusted basis. Tangible
personal property acquired as replacement property for converted property
shall be subject to taxation based upon the date the converted property
was acquired and at the Nebraska adjusted basis of the converted property
unless insurance proceeds are payable by reason of the conversion. For
purposes of this subsection, (a) converted property means tangible
personal property which is compulsorily or involuntarily converted as a
result of its destruction in whole or in part, theft, seizure,
requisition, or condemnation, or the threat or imminence thereof, and no
gain or loss is recognized for federal or state income tax purposes by
the holder of the property as a result of the conversion and (b)
replacement property means tangible personal property acquired within two
years after the close of the calendar year in which tangible personal
property was converted and which is, except for date of construction or
manufacture, substantially the same as the converted property.
Sec. 2. Section 77-5023, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-5023 (1) Pursuant to section 77-5022, the commission shall have
the power to increase or decrease the value of a class or subclass of
real property in any county or taxing authority or of real property
-3-

LB814 LB814
2026 2026
valued by the state so that all classes or subclasses of real property in
all counties fall within an acceptable range.
(2) An acceptable range is the percentage of variation from a
standard for valuation as measured by an established indicator of central
tendency of assessment. Acceptable ranges are:
(a) For agricultural land and horticultural land as defined in
section 77-1359: ,
(i) Before January 1, 2027, sixty-nine to seventy-five percent of
actual value, except that for school district taxes levied to pay the
principal and interest on bonds that are approved by a vote of the people
on or after January 1, 2022, the acceptable range is forty-four to fifty
percent of actual value; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 2027, forty-four to fifty percent of
actual value;
(b) For for lands receiving special valuation: ,
(i) Before January 1, 2027, sixty-nine to seventy-five percent of
special valuation as defined in section 77-1343, except that for school
district taxes levied to pay the principal and interest on bonds that are
approved by a vote of the people on or after January 1, 2022, the
acceptable range is forty-four to fifty percent of special valuation as
defined in section 77-1343; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 2027, forty-four to fifty percent of
special valuation as defined in section 77-1343;
(c) For for all other real property, ninety-two to one hundred
percent of actual value.
(3) Any increase or decrease shall cause the level of value
determined by the commission to be at the midpoint of the applicable
acceptable range.
(4) Any decrease or increase to a subclass of property shall also
cause the level of value determined by the commission for the class from
which the subclass is drawn to be within the applicable acceptable range.
-4-

LB814 LB814
2026 2026
(5) Whether or not the level of value determined by the commission
falls within an acceptable range or at the midpoint of an acceptable
range may be determined to a reasonable degree of certainty relying upon
generally accepted mass appraisal techniques.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-201 and 77-5023, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-